Hawaii statutes.
§425-164 Revocation of statement of
qualification. (a) The director may revoke the statement of qualification
of a limited liability partnership or statement of foreign qualification of a
foreign limited liability partnership if:

(1) The partnership fails to:

(A) Pay any fees prescribed by law;

(B) File its annual report for a period of
two years;

(C) Appoint and maintain an agent for service
of process as required; or

(D) File a statement of a change in the name
or business address of the agent as required by chapter 425R; or

(2) A misrepresentation has been made of any material
matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record or document
submitted by the partnership.

The director shall provide the partnership at least
sixty days' written notice of intent to revoke the statement. The notice shall
be mailed to the partnership at its last known address appearing in the records
of the director. The notice shall specify the annual report that has not been
filed or the fee that has not been paid, and the effective date of the
revocation. The revocation shall not be effective if the specified annual
report is filed and the specified fee is paid before the effective date of the
revocation.

(b) Revocation under subsection (a) shall only
affect a partnership's status as a limited liability partnership or foreign
limited liability partnership, and shall not be deemed an event of dissolution
of the partnership.

(c) A partnership whose statement of
qualification has been administratively revoked may apply to the director for
reinstatement within two years after the effective date of the revocation. The
application shall:

(1) Recite the name of the partnership and the
effective date of the revocation;

(2) Contain all reports due and unfiled;

(3) Contain the payment of all delinquent fees and
penalties; and

(4) Contain a certificate or other writing from the
department of taxation indicating that all taxes owed by the partnership have
been paid, a payment arrangement has been entered into, or the unpaid tax
liabilities are being contested in an administrative or judicial appeal with
the department of taxation.

(d) A reinstatement under subsection (c) shall
relate back to and take effect as of the effective date of the revocation, and
the partnership's status as a limited liability partnership shall continue upon
reinstatement as if the revocation had never occurred. [L 2000, c 218, pt of
§1; am L 2002, c 130, §92; am L 2003, c 124, §56; am L 2006, c 235, §15; am L
2009, c 23, §10 and c 55, §38; am L 2012, c 58, §15]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next